Utah statutes.
78B-5-816.   Right of rescission or disavowal of release, settlement, or statement by injured person in addition to other provisions.

The rights provided by Sections 78B-5-812 through 78B-5-816 are intended to be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any rights of rescission, rules of evidence, or provisions otherwise existing in the law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

